Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5209.01
Tax credit for financial management program participation.

A qualified beginning farmer or livestock producer shall be allowed a one-time refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 for the cost of participation in the financial management program required for eligibility under section 77-5209. The amount of the credit shall be the actual cost of participation in an approved program incurred during the tax year for which the credit is claimed, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars.

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB560, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 17.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.